Utah statutes.
4-5-6.   Definitions and standards of identity, quality, and fill of container -- Rules -- Temporary and special permits.

(1) (a)  Definitions and standards of identity, quality and fill of container, now or hereafter adopted under authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., are the definitions and standards of identity, quality and fill of container in this state. 

(b)  The department may adopt rules establishing definitions and standards of identity, quality and fill of container for foods where no federal regulations exist and may promulgate amendments to any federal regulations or state rules that set definitions and standards of identity, quality and fill of container for foods.

(2) (a)  Temporary permits now or hereafter granted for interstate shipment of experimental packs of food varying from the requirements of federal definitions and standards of identity are automatically effective in this state under the conditions provided in the permits.

(b)  The department may issue additional permits where they are necessary for the completion or conclusiveness of an otherwise adequate investigation and where the interests of consumers are safeguarded.

(c)  Permits are subject to the terms and conditions the department may prescribe by rule.

